Utah statutes.
63A-2-411.   Donation of state surplus property -- Disposal or destruction of state surplus property as waste.

The division shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, that permit an agency to destroy, dispose of as waste, or donate to a charitable organization state surplus property, if:

(1)  the state surplus property is worth less than $30;

(2)  the state surplus property fails to sell at auction;

(3)  the cost of selling the state surplus property is greater than or equal to the value of the state surplus property;

(4)  the state surplus property is no longer usable;

(5)  the state surplus property is damaged and cannot be repaired;

(6)  the state surplus property is damaged and the cost of repair is greater than or equal to the value of the state surplus property in a repaired state; or

(7)  the state surplus property can be replaced for less than the cost of repairing the state surplus property.



Enacted by Chapter 151, 2013 General Session

